Utah statutes.
9-6-404.   Creation of program -- Use of appropriations.
(1)  A Percent-for-Art Program shall be administered by the division.
(2)  Any appropriation received by the director shall be used to acquire
existing works of art or to commission the creation of works of art placed in
or at appropriate state buildings or facilities as determined by the division.
Any unexpended funds remaining at the end of the fiscal year shall be
nonlapsing and not revert to the General Fund.
